District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0556.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Fair Share Housing Targets Act of 2025”.
Sec. 2. Definitions.
For the purposes of this act, the term:
(1) "Affordable housing" means income- and rent-restricted housing supported or
subsidized by local and federal programs for households earning less than 80 percent of the area
median income, as that term is defined in Section 2(1) of the Housing Production Trust Fund Act
of 1988, effective March 16, 1989 (D.C. Law 7-202; D.C. Official Code § 42-2801(1)).


(2) "Housing target" means a housing production or affordable housing target
established pursuant to paragraphs (B) and (C) of section 3(a)(1).
(3) "Planning Area" means a geographic area defined in Volume 2 of the District
of Columbia Office of Planning's 2021 Comprehensive Plan and the Comprehensive Plan
Amendment Act of 2021, effective August 21, 2021 (D.C. Law 24-20; 68 DCR 6918).
(4) "Target date" means the date 5 years from the effective date of a housing
target established pursuant to section 3.
Sec. 3. Housing production and affordable housing targets.
(a) No later than 180 days from the effective date of this section, and every 5 years
thereafter, the Mayor shall publish and transmit to Council housing targets for each Planning
Area of the District, which shall include:
(1) A housing production target encompassing all new housing units produced;
(2) An affordable housing target; and
(3) The effective start date of the targets, which shall be within the same calendar
year as the date of transmittal to Council;
(4) The proposed methodology to track and enumerate units that shall count
towards the fulfillment of the housing targets.
(A) The addition of new affordable housing covenants on existing units
may be counted towards fulfillment of the affordable housing target as established in subsection
(a)(1) but shall not be counted towards fulfillment of the housing production target as established
in subsection (a)(2).


(B) Subsidy or other support provided to preserve an existing affordable
housing unit shall not be counted towards fulfillment of the affordable housing target as
established in subsection (a)(2).
(b) The Mayor shall maintain a publicly accessible dashboard to track progress towards
the fulfillment of housing targets established under this section, which shall be updated no less
than once per quarter.
(1) The dashboard established pursuant to this subsection shall provide
information about the affordability level of units produced in each planning area and shall
distinguish between affordable housing created as a result of new construction and new
affordable housing created through subsidy or the establishment of a covenant on an existing
unit.
(c) The District of Columbia Auditor shall audit the information provided by the Mayor
pursuant to subsection (b) no less than once during each 5-year period.
Sec. 4. Fair share analysis and remedy.
(a) This section applies to any Planning Area in which:
(1) Housing production has not met a target established pursuant to section 3 by
the target date; or
(2) As of January 1, 2026, has not had sufficient units of housing produced within
its boundaries to meet targets established in Mayor's Order 2019-036 and Figure 6 or Appendix 2
of the "Housing Equity Report: Creating Goals for Areas of Our City", published October 2019.
(b)(1) For each Planning Area subject to this section, the Mayor shall, within 120 days of
the target date, select a qualified independent evaluator to assess impediments to housing
production in the Planning Area. The independent evaluator shall transmit to Council and the


Mayor a report on impediments that resulted in the Planning Area's failure to meet housing
production and affordable housing targets, and proposed remedies.
(2) The independent evaluator selected by the Mayor pursuant to this subsection
may petition the Zoning Commission, on behalf of the District, for amendments within or related
to the Planning Area, pursuant to Chapters 4, 5, and 13 of Subtitle X of Title 11 of the District of
Columbia Municipal Regulations.
(c) For any Planning Area subject to this section, the Mayor is authorized to submit to
Council any amendments to the relevant Planning Area Element, Future Land Use Map, or
general elements that may be necessary to reduce barriers to housing production in the Planning
Area. Any such amendments may be submitted to Council at any time, notwithstanding the
regular cycle of Comprehensive Plan amendments and rewrites as set forth in section 2(a) of the
Comprehensive Plan Amendment Act of 2021, effective August 21, 2021 (D.C. Law 24-20, 10A
DCMR § 2500 et seq.).
Sec. 5. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 6. Effective date.
This act shall take effect after approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), a 30-day period of congressional review as
provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)), and publication in the District of
Columbia Register.